Missouri, session 2026, HB3371.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 247.031, RSMo, is repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 247.031, 247.033, and 247.229, to read as follows:
247.031. 1. Territory included in a district that is not being served by such district
may be detached from such district provided that there are no outstanding general obligation
or special obligation bonds and no contractual obligations of greater than twenty-five
thousand dollars for debt that pertains to infrastructure, fixed assets or obligations for the
purchase of water. If any such bonds or debt is outstanding, and the written consent of the
holders of such bonds or the creditors to such debt is obtained, then such territory may be
detached in spite of the existence of such bonds or debt, except such consent shall not be
required for special obligation bonds if the district has no water lines or other facilities located
within any of the territory detached. Detachment may be made by the filing of a petition with
the circuit court in which the district was incorporated. The petition shall contain a
description of the tract to be detached and a statement that the detachment is in the best
interest of the district or the inhabitants and property owners of the territory to be detached,
together with the facts supporting such allegation. The petition may be submitted by the
district acting through its board of directors, in which case the petition shall be signed by a
majority of the board of directors of the district. The petition may also be submitted by voters
residing in or by landowners owning land in the territory sought to be detached. If there are
more than ten voters and landowners in such territory, the petition shall be signed by five or
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3371 2
more voters or landowners within the territory; if there are less than ten voters and
landowners within such territory, the petition shall be signed by fifty percent or more of the
voters and landowners within the territory. In the event there are no voters living within such
territory proposed to be detached, then the petition may be submitted by owners of more than
fifty percent of the land in the territory proposed to be detached, in which case said petition
shall be signed by the owners so submitting the petition. In the event the petition is not
submitted by the district acting through its board of directors, the petitioner shall name the
district as a defendant and serve a copy of the petition upon the district by certified or
registered mail with a return receipt requested at least thirty-five days before the date of the
hearing of the petition.
2. Such petition shall be filed in the circuit court having jurisdiction and the court
shall set a date for hearing on the proposed detachment and the clerk of the circuit court shall
give notice of the filing of the petition and the hearing to the district by certified or registered
mail with a return receipt requested if the district is not the petitioner, and in a newspaper of
general circulation in the county in which the proceedings are pending and in a newspaper of
general circulation in the territory proposed to be detached. Such notice shall be published in
three consecutive issues of a weekly newspaper, or in lieu thereof, in twenty consecutive
issues of a daily newspaper. The last insertion of the notice shall be made not less than seven
nor more than twenty-one days before the hearing date. Such notice shall be substantially as
follows:
IN THE CIRCUIT COURT OF ______ COUNTY, MISSOURI
NOTICE OF THE FILING OF A PETITION
FOR TERRITORIAL DETACHMENT FROM
PUBLIC WATER SUPPLY DISTRICT NO. ______
OF ______ COUNTY, MISSOURI.
To all voters and landowners of land within the boundaries of the
above-described district:
You are hereby notified:
1. That a petition has been filed in this court for the detachment of
the following tracts of land from the above-named public water
supply district, as provided by law:
(Describe tracts of land).
2. That a hearing on said petition will be held before this court in __
____ on the ______ day of ______, 20______, at ______, _____
_.m.
3. Exceptions or objections to the detachment of said tracts from
said public water supply district may be made by the district or

HB 3371 3
any voter or landowner of land within the district from which
territory is sought to be detached, provided such exceptions or
objections are in writing, specify the grounds on which they are
made, and are filed with the court not later than five days prior to
the date of the hearing of the petition.
4. The names and addresses of the attorneys for the petitioner are:
_______________
Clerk of the Circuit Court of
______ County, Missouri
3. The court, for good cause shown, may continue the case or the hearing thereon
from time to time until final disposition thereof.
4. Exceptions or objections to the detachment of such territory may be made by any
voter or landowner within the boundaries of the district, including the territory to be detached.
In the event the petition is not submitted by the district acting through its board of directors,
the district may file exceptions or objections. Exceptions or objections shall be in writing,
shall specify the grounds upon which they are made, and shall be filed not later than five days
before the date set for hearing the petition. In considering the petition for detachment, the
court shall take into consideration the evidence in support of and opposition to the petition,
including such exceptions and objections. If the court finds that the detachment will be in the
best interest of the district and the inhabitants and landowners of the area to be detached will
not be adversely affected or if the court finds that the detachment will be in the best interest of
the inhabitants and landowners of the territory to be detached and will not adversely affect the
remainder of the district, it shall approve the detachment and grant the petition.
5. If the court approves the detachment, it shall make its order detaching the territory
described in the petition from the remainder of the district, or in the event it shall find that
only a portion of said territory should be detached, the court shall order such portion detached
from the district. The court shall also make any changes in subdistrict boundary lines it
deems necessary to meet the requirements of sections 247.010 to 247.220. Any subdistrict
line changes shall not become effective until the next annual election of a member of the
board of directors.
6. A certified copy of the court's order shall be filed in the office of the recorder of
deeds and in the office of the county clerk in each county in which any of the territory of the
district prior to detachment is located, and in the office of the secretary of state. Costs of the
proceeding shall be borne by the petitioner or petitioners.
7. The provisions of this section shall not apply to specific demand customers
requesting detachment under the provisions of section 247.033.

HB 3371 4
247.033. 1. As used in the section, the term "specific demand customer" shall
mean any customer with quantity and quality requirements that differ from the typical
customer of the public water supply district and may exceed the capabilities of the
public water supply district.
2. (1) Customers shall, when requesting service from a public water supply
district, inform the district of the quantity and quality of water the customer will
require.
(2) Upon receipt of a request for service from a customer, the public water
supply district shall respond within sixty days, informing the customer whether the
public water supply district can meet the requested quantity and quality of water within
a reasonable time frame and at a reasonable cost. For the purposes of this section,
"reasonable time frame" shall mean a period of time that does not create an undue
burden on the specific demand customer and "reasonable cost" shall mean a cost per
quantity and quality that is comparable to similar customers within the public water
supply district and may include actual costs incurred by the public water supply district.
(3) A specific demand customer may bring a challenge in a court of competent
jurisdiction on the basis of unreasonable time frame or unreasonable cost. If the court
finds in favor of the specific demand customer, the court shall enforce a reasonable time
frame and reasonable cost for service or allow the specific demand customer to detach
from the public water supply district.
3. (1) If the public water supply district declines or is unable to provide service
to a specific demand customer, the specific demand customer may provide the public
water supply district with a notice of intent to detach and shall be allowed to detach,
except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection.
(2) If the public water supply district is prevented from granting detachment as
a result of any federal loans, as described in subsection 1 of section 247.031, the public
water supply district shall not delay payment of such loan or enter into new loan
agreements until such specific demand customer is offered the opportunity to detach
from the public water supply district.
4. Specific demand customers may elect to pay the outstanding balance of any
federal loans of the public water supply district that prevent detachment. The specific
demand customer shall inform the district of the customer's intent to satisfy the federal
loan and detach from the public water supply district and the public water supply
district shall apply any moneys received from the specific demand customer to such
loans immediately upon receipt.
247.229. 1. If a public water supply district organized under the provisions set
forth in sections 247.010 to 247.220 has an outstanding debt owed to or guaranteed by

HB 3371 5
the United States government or any agency thereof, the board of directors of such
district shall accept any gift, donation, or bequest of money made to the district for the
payment of debt, unless acceptance of the gift, donation, or bequest would be in
violation of current law, or the fulfillment of the terms of the gift, donation, or bequest
are in violation of current law.
2. Monetary gifts, donations, or bequests accepted by the board of directors
pursuant to subsection 1 of this section shall be applied first to the payment or
prepayment of any outstanding debt of the district that is owed to or guaranteed by the
United States government or any agency thereof, if the gift, donation, or bequest was
given for that purpose. Monetary gifts, donations, or bequests that are given without a
designated purpose may be used at the discretion of the board.
3. If the amount of any such monetary gift, donation, or bequest exceeds the
amount necessary to pay or prepay all outstanding debt owed to or guaranteed by the
United States government or any agency thereof, the board of directors may apply the
excess funds as otherwise authorized by current law.
4. If no such debt exists at the time the gift, donation, or bequest is received, or if
the donor has expressly directed the application of the gift, donation, or bequest to
another purpose, the board of directors may apply the funds as otherwise authorized by
current law.
5. The board of directors shall maintain records of all monetary gifts, donations,
or bequests received and the application thereof, and shall make such records available
for public inspection upon request.
6. Any person or entity may, at any time, tender payment in full or in part of any
outstanding debt of the district that is owed to or guaranteed by the United States
government or any agency thereof, for the benefit of the district. The board of directors
shall take all actions necessary to authorize and facilitate the acceptance and application
of any such payment to the indebtedness, provided that the payment is made without
condition, restriction, or requirement for consideration or performance by the district,
other than the application of the payment toward the indebtedness. The board of
directors shall not reverse, cancel, reject, or otherwise interfere with the application of
such payment to the debt obligation, and, if required, shall obtain any United States
approval necessary for the application of such payment.
✔